Rhode Island, session 2025, SB1123.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 44-3 of the General Laws entitled "Property Subject to Taxation" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
44-3-28.1. Smithfield -- Exemption for people with paraplegia.
The town council of the town of Smithfield may, by ordinance, provide for a tax credit on
real property situated in the town, owned and occupied by any person with paraplegia and who by
reason of the paraplegic disability requires “specially adapted housing”. For the purposes of this
section, “specially adapted housing” means real property which has been specifically altered and/or
changed in some way in order to meet the needs of a person or persons with a paraplegic disability
who reside at the property.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002963
========